Massachusetts, session 194th, H3357.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 9A of Chapter 7 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following paragraphs at the end thereof: 
Beginning in July 1, 2025, all Commonwealth purchases or leases for new medium- and 
heavy-duty trucks shall be for models that are zero emissions vehicles. Further, the 
Commonwealth shall ensure that its fleet of medium- and heavy-duty, whether owned or leased, 
is comprised of zero emission vehicles by June 30, 2035. Zero emission vehicle shall mean a 
battery electric medium- or heavy-duty truck. 
In the event that there are no battery electric medium- and heavy-duty trucks that meet 
the Commonwealth’s needs or cannot be supported by the Commonwealth’s existing charging 
infrastructure for medium- and heavy-duty trucks, the secretary shall be permitted to purchase 
any other medium- or heavy-duty truck that is not a battery electric vehicle. 

of 3 12  The secretary shall submit to the clerks of the senate and house of representatives and the 
chairs of the joint committee on transportation a statement annually, not later than July 1, 
detailing the progress made in meeting the requirements of this section. The report shall include: 
(i) a complete listing of medium- and heavy-duty trucks leased, owned or assigned to each 
agency; and (ii) a description of each medium- and heavy-duty truck, including the year, make 
and model, whether the truck is powered by an internal combustion engine, a mild hybrid engine, 
a plug-in hybrid motor, a fully battery electric motor, a hydrogen fuel cell electric motor, a 
compressed liquefied natural gas engine, a propane engine or other means of propulsion. If a 
zero emission medium- or heavy-duty truck is not purchased or leased, the secretary shall 
provide, in each instance, a specific explanation as to why a zero emission vehicle could not have 
sufficiently fulfilled the intended functions. 
SECTION 2. Section 142K of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following at the end thereof:- 
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Department of 
Environmental Protection shall not implement or enforce the Advanced Clean Trucks and 
Heavy-Duty Omnibus regulations, as modified to apply to Massachusetts, earlier than July 1, 
2027. As used in this section, "Advanced Clean Trucks regulation” means the portion of the 
California Low Emission Vehicle program that was adopted by the California Air Resources 
Board, and which would require manufacturers of medium-duty and heavy-duty motor vehicles 
to sell an increasing percentage of zero-emissions vehicles, including the provisions codified in 
sections 1905, 1963, and sections 1963.1 through 1963.5 of Title 13 of the California Code of 
Regulations. “Heavy Duty Omnibus regulation” means the portion of the California Low 
Emission Vehicle program that was adopted by the California Air Resources Board regulation in 

of 3 35 title 13, California Code of Regulations sections 2139.5, and 2169.1 through 2169.8 and any 
other related amendments relative to the emissions standards for nitrogen oxide for medium-duty 
and heavy-duty motor vehicles. 
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect immediately upon passage.